Arkansas, session 2025, HB1670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 — Preceptor Tax Incentive Program

26-51-2901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Preceptor Tax
Incentive Program".

26-51-2902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
*CEB035*
03/04/2025 2:06:09 PM CEB035

HB1670
(1) "Counseling student" means an individual participating in a
training program that is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting
body for training a student to become a licensed professional counselor,
licensed associate counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, or
licensed associate marriage and family therapist under § 17-27-101 et seq.;
(2) "Faculty preceptor" means an individual who is a:
(A) Physician licensed under the Arkansas Medical
Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et
seq.;
(B) Registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse,
or registered nurse practitioner under § 17-87-101 et seq.;
(C) Physician assistant licensed under § 17-105-101 et
seq.; or
(D) A licensed professional counselor, licensed associate
counselor, or licensed marriage and family therapist by the Arkansas Board of
Examiners in Counseling under § 17-27-101 et seq.;
(3) "Medical student" means an individual participating in a
training program that is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting
body for training a student to become a physician licensed to practice
medicine under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-
95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.;
(4) "Nursing student" means an individual participating in a
training program that is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting
body for training a student to become a registered nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, or registered nurse practitioner under § 17-87-101 et seq.;
(5) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice
medicine under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-
95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.;
(6) "Physician assistant student" means an individual
participating in a training program that is accredited by a nationally
recognized accrediting body for training a student to become a physician
assistant as defined in § 17-105-101 et seq.;
(7) "Preceptorship rotation" means a period of preceptorship
training of one (1) or more residents, medical students, physician assistant
students, counseling students, or nursing students that occurs in the state
in aggregate totals at least one hundred sixty (160) hours;
03/04/2025 2:06:09 PM CEB035

HB1670
(8) "Preceptorship training" means training of a resident,
medical student, counseling student, nursing student, or physician assistant
student that is required for completion of an accredited training program;
and
(9) "Resident" means an individual participating in a graduate
medical education training program accredited by the Accreditation Council
for Graduate Medical Education.

26-51-2903. Uncompensated faculty preceptor — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "uncompensated faculty preceptor" means
the faculty preceptor who:
(1) Provides a preceptorship rotation; and
(2) Does not receive any kind of financial remuneration from any
party for conducting the preceptorship rotation.
(b)(1) An uncompensated faculty preceptor is allowed an income tax
credit against the income tax imposed by this chapter in the amount
determined under subsection (c) of this section for wages he or she receives
as a physician, licensed professional counselor, licensed associate
counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, professional nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this
section exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be
refunded to the taxpayer.
(c)(1) The amount of the tax credit allowed under subsection (b) of
this section is one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each resident, medical
student, physician assistant student, counseling student, or nursing student
who participates in the preceptorship training during the calendar year.
(2) The taxpayer shall not claim more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per year in income tax credits under this section.

26-51-2904. Compensated faculty preceptor — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "compensated faculty preceptor" means a
faculty preceptor who:
(1) Provides a preceptorship rotation; and
(2) Receives payment as an independent contractor as
03/04/2025 2:06:09 PM CEB035

HB1670
compensation for conducting the preceptorship rotation paid for by the school
at which the medical student, nursing student, counseling student, or
physician assistant student has matriculated.
(b)(1) A compensated faculty preceptor is allowed an income tax credit
against the income tax imposed by this chapter in the amount determined under
subsection (c) of this section for payments he or she receives as an
independent contractor for conducting the preceptorship training.
(2) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this
section exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be
refunded to the taxpayer.
(c) The amount of the tax credit allowed under subsection (b) of this
section is equal to the amount the taxpayer received as compensation for
conducting the preceptorship training, not to exceed six thousand dollars
($6,000) per taxpayer.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



















03/04/2025 2:06:09 PM CEB035